Utah statutes.
67-4a-212.   Wages.

Unpaid wages, bonuses, and commissions, including wages represented by unpresented payroll checks, owing in the ordinary course of the holder's business that remain unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after becoming payable are considered abandoned.



Enacted by Chapter 198, 1995 General Session

